Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 32 Guaranteed Asset-Protection Waivers

19-32-1.
Legislative intent and purpose.

The general assembly finds that guaranteed asset-protection waivers are not insurance. All guaranteed asset-protection waivers issued prior to and after the date of enactment of this chapter shall not be construed as insurance.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a framework within which guaranteed asset-protection waivers are defined and may be offered within this state.

This chapter does not apply to:

An insurance policy offered by an insurer under title 27 including, but not limited to, vendor single interest coverage; or

A debt cancellation or debt suspension contract being offered in compliance with §§

19-3-1

and

19-5-25

or 12 C.F.R. Part 37 or 12 C.F.R. Part 721 or other federal law.

Guaranteed asset-protection waivers governed under this section are not insurance and are exempt from the insurance laws of this state. Persons marketing, selling, or offering to sell guaranteed asset-protection waivers to borrowers that comply with this section are exempt from this state’s insurance licensing requirements.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-2.
Definitions.

The following are terms defined for purposes of this chapter and are not intended to provide actual terms required in guaranteed asset-protection waivers:

“Administrator” means a person, other than an insurer or creditor who performs administrative or operational functions pursuant to guaranteed asset-protection waiver programs.

“Borrower” means a debtor, retail buyer, or lessee, under a finance agreement.

“Creditor” means:

The lender in a loan or credit transaction;

The lessor in a lease transaction;

Any dealer of motor vehicles that provides credit to retail buyers of such motor vehicles, provided that such entities comply with the provisions of this section;

Any retail seller of motor vehicles as defined herein in commercial retail installment transactions; or

The assignees of any of the foregoing to whom the credit obligation is payable.

“Finance agreement” means a loan, lease, or retail installment sales contract for the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle.

“Free-look period” means the period of time from the effective date of the GAP waiver until the date the borrower may cancel the contract without penalty, fees, or costs to the borrower. This period of time must be not less than thirty (30) days.

“Guaranteed asset-protection waiver” or “GAP waiver” means a contractual agreement wherein a creditor agrees, for a separate charge, to cancel or waive all or part of amounts due on a borrower’s finance agreement in the event of a total, physical-damage loss or unrecovered theft of the motor vehicle, which agreement must be part of, or a separate addendum to, the finance agreement.

“Insurer” means an insurance company licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to do business under title 27.

“Motor vehicle” means self-propelled or towed vehicles designed for personal or commercial use, including, but not limited to: automobiles, trucks, motorcycles, recreational vehicles, all-terrain vehicles, snowmobiles, campers, boats, personal watercraft, and trailers for motorcycles, boats, campers, and personal watercraft.

“Person” includes an individual, company, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, or other legal entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-3.
Requirements for offering guaranteed asset-protection waivers.

GAP waivers may be offered, sold, or provided to borrowers in this state in compliance with this chapter.

GAP waivers may, at the option of the creditor, be sold for a single payment, or may be offered with a monthly or periodic payment option.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, any cost to the borrower for a guaranteed asset-protection waiver entered into in compliance with the Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., and its implementing regulations, as they may be amended from time to time, must be separately stated and is not to be considered a finance charge or interest.

A retail seller must insure its GAP waiver obligations under a contractual liability or other insurance policy issued by an insurer. A creditor, other than a retail seller, may insure its GAP waiver obligations under a contractual liability policy or other such policy issued by an insurer. Any such insurance policy may be directly obtained by a creditor, retail seller, or may be procured by an administrator to cover a creditor’s or retail seller’s obligations; provided, that retail sellers that are lessors on motor vehicles are not required to insure obligations related to GAP waivers on such leased vehicles.

The GAP waiver remains a part of the finance agreement upon the assignment, sale, or transfer of such finance agreement by the creditor.

Any creditor that offers a GAP waiver must report the sale of, and forward funds received on all such waivers to the designated party, if any, as prescribed in any applicable administrative services agreement, contractual liability policy, other insurance policy, or other specified program documents.

Funds received or held by a creditor or administrator and belonging to an insurer, creditor, or administrator, pursuant to the terms of a written agreement, must be held by such creditor or administrator in a fiduciary capacity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-4.
Contractual liability or other insurance policies.

Contractual liability or other insurance policies insuring GAP waivers must state the obligation of the insurer to reimburse or pay to the creditor any sums the creditor is legally obligated to waive under the GAP waivers issued by the creditor and purchased or held by the borrower.

Coverage under a contractual liability or other insurance policy insuring a GAP waiver must also cover any subsequent assignee upon the assignment, sale, or transfer of the finance agreement.

Coverage under a contractual liability or other insurance policy insuring a GAP waiver must remain in effect unless cancelled or terminated in compliance with title 27.

The cancellation or termination of a contractual liability or other insurance policy must not reduce the insurer’s responsibility for GAP waivers issued by the creditor prior to the date of cancellation or termination and for which premium has been received by the insurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-5.
Disclosures.

Guaranteed asset-protection waivers must disclose, in writing and in clear, understandable language that is easy to read, the following:

The name and address of the initial creditor and the borrower at the time of sale, and the identity of any administrator if different from the creditor.

The purchase price and the terms of the GAP waiver, including, without limitation, the requirements for protection, conditions, or exclusions associated with the GAP waiver.

That the borrower may cancel the GAP waiver within a free-look period as specified in the waiver, and will be entitled to a full refund of the purchase price, as long as no benefits have been provided; or in the event benefits have been provided, the borrower may receive a full or partial refund pursuant to the terms of the waiver.

The procedure the borrower must follow, if any, to obtain GAP-waiver benefits under the terms and conditions of the waiver, including a telephone number and address where the borrower may apply for waiver benefits.

Whether or not the GAP waiver is cancellable after the free-look period, and the conditions under which it may be cancelled or terminated, including the procedures for requesting any refund due.

That in order to receive any refund due in the event of a borrower’s cancellation of the GAP waiver agreement or early termination of the finance agreement after the free-look period of the GAP waiver, the borrower, in accordance with terms of the waiver, must provide a written request to cancel to the creditor, administrator, or such other party within ninety (90) days of the occurrence of the event terminating the finance agreement.

The methodology for calculating any refund of the unearned purchase price of the GAP waiver due, in the event of cancellation of the GAP waiver or early termination of the finance agreement.

That neither the extension of credit, the terms of the credit, nor the terms of the related motor vehicle sale or lease may be conditioned upon the purchase of the GAP waiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-6.
Cancellation.

GAP-waiver agreements may be cancellable or non-cancellable after the free-look period. GAP waivers must provide that if a borrower cancels a waiver within the free-look period, the borrower will be entitled to a full refund of the purchase price, as long as no benefits have been provided; or in the event benefits have been provided, the borrower may receive a full or partial refund pursuant to the terms of the waiver.

In the event of a borrower’s cancellation of the GAP waiver or early termination of the finance agreement after the agreement has been in effect beyond the free-look period, the borrower may be entitled to a refund of any unearned portion of the purchase price of the waiver, unless the waiver provides otherwise. In order to receive a refund, the borrower, in accordance with any applicable terms of the waiver, must provide a written request to the creditor, administrator, or other party, within ninety (90) days of the event terminating the finance agreement.

If the cancellation of a GAP waiver occurs as a result of a default under the finance agreement or the repossession of the motor vehicle associated with the finance agreement, or any other termination of the finance agreement, any refund due may be paid directly to the creditor or administrator and applied as set forth in subsection (d).

Any cancellation refund under subsection (a), (b), or (c) may be applied by the creditor as a reduction of the amount owed under the finance agreement, unless the borrower can show that the finance agreement has been paid in full.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-7.
Commercial transactions exempted.

Sections

19-32-3(c)

,

19-32-5

and

19-32-8

are not applicable to a GAP waiver offered in connection with a lease or retail installment sale associated with transactions between business entities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.

19-32-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of the provision to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter, and the application of the provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, is not to be affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 530, § 1.